Florida, session 2026, HB223.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
105
106 Section 1. Chapter 462, Florida Statutes, entitled
107 "Naturopathy," is redesignated as "Naturopathic Medicine."
108 Section 2. Section 462.001, Florida Statutes, is created
109 to read:
110 462.001 Legislative findings; purpose.—The Legislature
111 finds that the interest of public health requires modernization
112 of regulation related to naturopathy in this state. Since 1927,
113 when Florida first regulated naturopathy, the profession and its
114 role within the healthcare industry have evolved including the
115 distinction that exists today between naturopathy and
116 naturopathic medicine, and this chapter reflects that evolution.
117 It is the intent of the Legislature to free naturopathy in this
118 state by removing the near total ban on the profession that has
119 been in place since 1959 by ensuring:
120 (1) Naturopathy is offered by naturopaths in this state.
121 (2) Naturopathic medicine is practiced in this state by
122 issuing licenses to naturopathic doctors who meet clear
123 standards of education and training, and who are held
124 accountable for safe practice.
125 Section 3. Section 462.002, Florida Statutes, is created
Page 5 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
126 to read:
127 462.002 Exceptions.—
128 (1) This chapter does not apply to:
129 (a) Other duly licensed health care practitioners acting
130 within their respective scopes of practice, as authorized by
131 general law.
132 (b) Students practicing under the direct supervision of a
133 licensed naturopathic doctor as part of a preceptorship program
134 while enrolled in a college or university program that is
135 accredited by, or has candidacy status with, the Council on
136 Naturopathic Medical Education or an equivalent accrediting body
137 for the naturopathic medical profession which is recognized by
138 the United States Department of Education and the board.
139 (c) Naturopathic residents practicing under the direct
140 supervision of a licensed naturopathic doctor at a residency
141 site recognized by the Council on Naturopathic Medical Education
142 or by an equivalent accrediting body for the naturopathic
143 medical profession which is recognized by the United States
144 Department of Education or the board.
145 (d) A naturopathic doctor who holds an active license in
146 another jurisdiction of the United States or Canada and is
147 performing naturopathic procedures or demonstrating equipment or
148 supplies for educational purposes at a board-approved continuing
149 education program.
150 (e) The practice of the religious tenets of any church in
Page 6 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
151 this state.
152 (f) The domestic administration of recognized family
153 remedies.
154 (2) This chapter does not prohibit:
155 (a) A person who sells a dietary supplement from providing
156 information about the dietary supplement.
157 (b) Any person:
158 1. Not licensed as a naturopathic doctor from employing in
159 his or her occupation Ayurveda, herbalism, homeopathy,
160 naturopathy as defined in s. 462.003, nutrition, traditional
161 Chinese medicine, or other natural therapy included as part of
162 the practice of naturopathic medicine, as defined in s. 462.003;
163 or
164 2. From using terms, including, but not limited to,
165 "certified naturopath," "naturopath," "naturopathy,"
166 "traditional naturopath," or "traditional naturopath," provided
167 that the person does not:
168 a. Use a title protected under s. 462.006; or
169 b. Represent or assume the character or appearance of a
170 person described in s. 462.006.
171 Section 4. Section 462.01, Florida Statutes, is renumbered
172 as section 462.003, Florida Statutes, and amended to read:
173 462.003 462.01 Definitions.—As used in this chapter, the
174 term:
175 (1) "Board" means the Board of Naturopathic Medicine.
Page 7 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
176 (2) "Department" means the Department of Health.
177 (3)(a) "Naturopathic medicine" and "practice of
178 naturopathic medicine" mean the diagnosis, prevention, and
179 treatment by a naturopathic doctor of any deformity, disease,
180 injury, pain, or other physical or mental condition using
181 botanical or fungal extracts, clinical nutrition, counseling
182 techniques, dietary supplements, environmental medicine,
183 homeopathic remedies, imaging studies, laboratory testing,
184 lifestyle medicine, natural substances, physical exam, or
185 physical medicine in a manner consistent with the education
186 offered by naturopathic doctoral degree programs accredited by,
187 or having candidacy status with, the Council on Naturopathic
188 Medical Education or another accrediting agency recognized by
189 the United States Department of Education or the board, and
190 applied in a manner consistent with the principles of
191 naturopathic medicine and the naturopathic therapeutic order
192 defined herein.
193 (b) The term does not include any of the following:
194 1. Prescribing, dispensing, or administering any legend
195 drug or prescription drug outside of natural, non-pharmacologic
196 substances such as but not to limited vitamin B12.
197 2. Performing any surgical procedure.
198 3. Practicing or claiming to practice as a medical doctor
199 or physician, an osteopathic physician, a dentist, a podiatric
200 physician, an optometrist, a psychologist, a nurse practitioner,
Page 8 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
201 a physician assistant, a chiropractic physician, a physical
202 therapist, an acupuncturist, a midwife, or a health care
203 practitioner as defined in s. 456.001.
204 4. Using general or spinal anesthetics.
205 5. Administering ionizing radioactive substances.
206 6. Performing chiropractic or osteopathic adjustments or
207 manipulations that include high–velocity thrusts at or beyond
208 the end range of normal joint motion, unless the naturopathic
209 doctor is also licensed as a chiropractic physician or an
210 osteopathic physician.
211 7. Performing acupuncture, unless the naturopathic doctor
212 is also licensed as an acupuncturist.
213 8. Managing labor and delivery, unless the naturopathic
214 doctor is also a licensed midwife.
215 (4) "Naturopathic doctor" means a person who is licensed
216 to practice naturopathic medicine under this chapter.
217 (5) "Naturopathic therapeutic order" means a principle
218 defined by the American Association of Naturopathic Physicians
219 to guide naturopathic doctors in resolving a patient's symptoms
220 and addressing the root cause of a patient's disease while using
221 the least therapeutic force necessary.
222 (6)(1) "Natureopathy" and "Naturopathy" is shall be
223 construed as synonymous with "traditional naturopathy" and is
224 understood to be distinct from naturopathic medicine, means the
225 traditional, non-invasive health practice offered by naturopaths
Page 9 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
226 and traditional naturopaths focusing on education about natural
227 practices and substances that can be used to promote general
228 health and well-being terms and mean the use and practice of
229 psychological, mechanical, and material health sciences to aid
230 in purifying, cleansing, and normalizing human tissues for the
231 preservation or restoration of health, according to the
232 fundamental principles of anatomy, physiology, and applied
233 psychology, as may be required. Naturopathic practice employs,
234 among other agencies, phytotherapy, dietetics, psychotherapy,
235 suggestotherapy, hydrotherapy, zone therapy, biochemistry,
236 external applications, electrotherapy, mechanotherapy,
237 mechanical and electrical appliances, hygiene, first aid,
238 sanitation, and heliotherapy; provided, however, that nothing in
239 this chapter shall be held or construed to authorize any
240 naturopathic physician licensed hereunder to practice materia
241 medica or surgery or chiropractic medicine, nor shall the
242 provisions of this law in any manner apply to or affect the
243 practice of osteopathic medicine, chiropractic medicine,
244 Christian Science, or any other treatment authorized and
245 provided for by law for the cure or prevention of disease and
246 ailments.
247 (7) "Principles of naturopathic medicine" means the
248 foundations of naturopathic medical education and practice as
249 set forth by the American Association of Naturopathic Physicians
250 or the board and embodied in the education offered by
Page 10 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
251 naturopathic doctoral degree programs accredited by, or having
252 candidacy status with, the Council on Naturopathic Medical
253 Education or another accrediting agency recognized by the United
254 States Department of Education or the board, and including all
255 of the following principles:
256 (a) The healing power of nature.
257 (b) Identify and treat the causes.
258 (c) First do no harm.
259 (d) Doctor as teacher.
260 (e) Treat the whole person.
261 (f) Prevention.
262 Section 5. Section 462.004, Florida Statutes, is created
263 to read:
264 462.004 Board of Naturopathic Medicine.—
265 (1) There is created within the department the Board of
266 Naturopathic Medicine, composed of seven members appointed by
267 the Governor and confirmed by the Senate.
268 (2)(a) Four members of the board must be licensed
269 naturopathic doctors who are residents of this state.
270 (b) Two members of the board must be physicians licensed
271 under chapter 458 or chapter 459 who are residents of this
272 state.
273 (c) One member must be a resident of this state who is
274 not, and has never been, licensed as a naturopathic doctor, an
275 osteopathic physician, a physician, or any other closely related
Page 11 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
276 profession.
277 (d) At least one member must be 60 years of age or older.
278 (3) As the terms of the members expire, the Governor shall
279 appoint successors for terms of 4 years, and such members shall
280 serve until their successors are appointed.
281 (4) All provisions of chapter 456 relating to the board
282 shall apply.
283 Section 6. Section 462.023, Florida Statutes, is
284 renumbered as section 462.005, Florida Statutes, and amended to
285 read:
286 462.005 462.023 Rulemaking authority; powers and duties of
287 the board department.—The board department may adopt such rules
288 pursuant to ss. 120.536(1) and 120.54 to implement the
289 provisions of this chapter conferring duties upon it as are
290 necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter, initiate
291 disciplinary action as provided by this chapter, and shall
292 establish fees based on its estimates of the revenue required to
293 administer this chapter but shall not exceed the fee amounts
294 provided in this chapter. The department shall not adopt any
295 rules which would cause any person who was not licensed in
296 accordance with this chapter on July 1, 1959, and had not been a
297 resident of the state for 2 years prior to such date, to become
298 licensed.
299 Section 7. Section 462.006, Florida Statutes, is created
300 to read:
Page 12 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
301 462.006 License required.—
302 (1) Unless licensed under this chapter, a person may not
303 practice naturopathic medicine in this state and may not
304 promote, identify, or describe herself or himself as a "doctor
305 of naturopathic medicine," or a "naturopathic doctor" or use the
306 post-nominals "N.D." or "N.M.D."
307 (2) A person who violates this section commits a
308 misdemeanor of the second degree, punishable as provided in s.
309 775.082 or s. 775.083.
310 Section 8. Section 462.007, Florida Statutes, is created
311 to read:
312 462.007 Licensure by examination.—
313 (1) Any person desiring to be licensed as a naturopathic
314 doctor must apply to the department on forms furnished by the
315 department. The department shall license each applicant who
316 completes the application form and who the board certifies has
317 met all of the following criteria:
318 (a) Is at least 21 years of age.
319 (b) Has received a bachelor's degree from one of the
320 following:
321 1. A college or university accredited by an accrediting
322 agency recognized by the United States Department of Education
323 or the Council for Higher Education Accreditation or its
324 successor entity recognized by the board;
325 2. A college or university in Canada which is a member of
Page 13 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
326 Universities Canada or a successor entity recognized by the
327 board; or
328 3. A college or university in a foreign country, other
329 than Canada, when such applicant has provided evidence that her
330 or his educational credentials are deemed equivalent to those
331 provided in this country or Canada. To have educational
332 credentials deemed equivalent, the applicant must provide her or
333 his foreign educational credentials, including transcripts,
334 course descriptions or syllabi, and diplomas, to a nationally
335 recognized educational credential evaluating agency approved by
336 the board for the evaluation and determination of equivalency of
337 the foreign educational credentials.
338 (c) Has received a naturopathic doctoral degree from a
339 college or program accredited by, or having candidacy status
340 with, the Council on Naturopathic Medical Education or another
341 accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of
342 Education or the board.
343 (d) Is physically and mentally fit to practice as a
344 naturopathic doctor.
345 (e) Is of good moral character.
346 (f) Has submitted to the department a set of fingerprints
347 on a form and in accordance with procedures specified by the
348 department, along with payment in an amount equal to the costs
349 incurred by the department for the criminal background check of
350 the applicant.
Page 14 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
351 (g) Has obtained a passing score on Part I - Biomedical
352 Science Examination and Part II - Core Clinical Science
353 Examination of the competency-based national Naturopathic
354 Physician Licensing Examination administered by the North
355 American Board of Naturopathic Examiners, or an equivalent
356 examination offered by an equivalent or successor entity, as
357 approved by the board.
358 (2) The department and the board shall ensure that
359 applicants for licensure satisfy the applicable criteria in this
360 section through an investigative process. If the investigative
361 process is not completed within the timeframe established in s.
362 120.60(1) and the department or board has reason to believe that
363 the applicant does not meet such criteria, the State Surgeon
364 General or her or his designee may issue a 90-day licensure
365 delay, which must be in writing and sufficient to notify the
366 applicant of the reason for the delay. This subsection prevails
367 over any conflicting provision of s. 120.60(1).
368 (3) The board may not certify to the department for
369 licensure any applicant who is under investigation in another
370 jurisdiction for an offense that would constitute a violation of
371 this chapter or chapter 456 until the investigation has been
372 completed.
373 (4) If the board determines that an applicant for
374 licensure has failed to meet, to the board's satisfaction, any
375 of the requirements of this section, the board may take one of
Page 15 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
376 the following actions:
377 (a) Refusal to certify to the department an application
378 for licensure.
379 (b) Certification to the department of an application for
380 licensure with restrictions on the scope of practice of the
381 naturopathic doctor.
382 (c) Certification to the department of an application for
383 licensure with a probationary period for the applicant, subject
384 to such conditions as the board specifies, including, but not
385 limited to, requiring the naturopathic doctor to submit to
386 treatment, attend continuing education courses, submit to
387 reexamination, or work under the supervision of another
388 naturopathic doctor.
389 Section 9. Section 462.008, Florida Statutes, is created
390 to read:
391 462.008 Licensure by endorsement.—The department shall
392 issue a license to practice naturopathic medicine by endorsement
393 to an applicant who, upon applying to the department on forms
394 furnished by the department, the board certifies has met the
395 requirements for licensure by endorsement under s. 456.0145.
396 Section 10. Section 462.08, Florida Statutes, is
397 renumbered as section 462.009, Florida Statutes, and amended to
398 read:
399 462.009 462.08 Renewal of license to practice naturopathic
400 medicine naturopathy.—
Page 16 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
401 (1) In order to continue practicing naturopathic medicine
402 in this state, each licensed naturopathic doctor must
403 licenseholder shall biennially renew her or his license to
404 practice naturopathic medicine naturopathy. The applicant for
405 license renewal must furnish to the board department such
406 evidence as it requires of the applicant's compliance with s.
407 462.011 s. 462.18, relating to continuing education educational
408 requirements. The nonrefundable biennial renewal fee, the amount
409 of which shall be determined by the department but which may not
410 exceed $1,000, must be paid at the time the application for
411 renewal of the license is filed.
412 (2) The department shall adopt rules establishing
413 procedures for the biennial renewal of licenses under this
414 chapter.
415 Section 11. Section 462.18, Florida Statutes, is
416 renumbered as section 462.011, Florida Statutes, and amended to
417 read:
418 462.011 462.18 Continuing education Educational
419 requirements.—
420 (1) At the time each licensee renews shall renew her or
421 his license as otherwise provided in s. 462.009 this chapter,
422 each licensee must, in addition to the payment of the regular
423 renewal fee, shall furnish to the department satisfactory
424 evidence that, in the preceding biennial period, the licensee
425 has completed the continuing education requirements of this
Page 17 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
426 section.
427 (2) The board shall require each licensee to complete at
428 least 60 hours of continuing education during each biennial
429 renewal period.
430 (a) The board shall approve organizations that accredit
431 naturopathic continuing education providers, including, but not
432 limited to, the American Association of Naturopathic Physicians,
433 and the North American Naturopathic Continuing Education
434 Accreditation Council.
435 (b) The determination of whether substitute continuing
436 education programs are permissible is solely within the
437 discretion of the board.
438 (3) The licensee must use the electronic continuing
439 education tracking system developed by the department under s.
440 456.0361 to demonstrate compliance with the continuing education
441 requirements of this section year preceding each such
442 application for renewal, the licensee has attended the 2-day
443 educational program as promulgated and conducted by the Florida
444 Naturopathic Physicians Association, Inc., or, as a substitute
445 therefor, the equivalent of that program as approved by the
446 department. The department shall send a written notice to this
447 effect to every person holding a valid license to practice
448 naturopathy within this state at least 30 days prior to May 1 in
449 each even-numbered year, directed to the last known address of
450 such licensee, and shall enclose with the notice proper blank
Page 18 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
451 forms for application for annual license renewal. All of the
452 details and requirements of the aforesaid educational program
453 shall be adopted and prescribed by the department. In the event
454 of national emergencies, or for sufficient reason, the
455 department shall have the power to excuse the naturopathic
456 physicians as a group or as individuals from taking this
457 postgraduate course.
458 (2) The determination of whether a substitute annual
459 educational program is necessary shall be solely within the
460 discretion of the department.
461 Section 12. Section 462.19, Florida Statutes, is
462 renumbered as section 462.012, Florida Statutes, and amended to
463 read:
464 462.012 462.19 Renewal of license; inactive status;
465 reactivation of license.—
466 (1) A licensee may reactivate an inactive license by
467 applying to the department and submitting proof of compliance
468 with the financial responsibility requirements of s. 462.015.
469 (2) The board shall adopt rules relating to the
470 reactivation of licenses that have become inactive and the
471 renewal of inactive licenses. The rules must include continuing
472 education requirements as a condition for reactivating a
473 license. The continuing education requirements for reactivating
474 a license may not be fewer than 20 classroom hours for each year
475 the license was inactive.
Page 19 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
476 (1) The department shall renew a license upon receipt of
477 the renewal application and fee.
478 (2) A licensee may request that her or his license be
479 placed in an inactive status by making application to the
480 department and paying a fee in an amount set by the department
481 not to exceed $50.
482 Section 13. Section 462.14, Florida Statutes, is
483 renumbered as section 462.017, Florida Statutes, and amended to
484 read:
485 462.017 462.14 Grounds for disciplinary action; action by
486 the department.—
487 (1) The following acts constitute grounds for denial of a
488 license or disciplinary action, as specified in s. 456.072(2):
489 (1)(a) Attempting to obtain, obtaining, or renewing a
490 license to practice naturopathic medicine by bribery, by
491 fraudulent misrepresentation, or through an error of the
492 department.
493 (2)(b) Having a license to practice naturopathic medicine
494 revoked, suspended, or otherwise acted against, including the
495 denial of licensure, by the licensing authority of another
496 state, territory, or country.
497 (3)(c) Being convicted or found guilty, regardless of
498 adjudication, of a crime in any jurisdiction which directly
499 relates to the practice of naturopathic medicine or to the
500 ability to practice naturopathic medicine. Any plea of nolo
Page 20 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
501 contendere shall be considered a conviction for purposes of this
502 chapter.
503 (4)(d) False, deceptive, or misleading advertising related
504 to the practice of naturopathic medicine.
505 (5)(e) Advertising, practicing, or attempting to practice
506 under a name other than one's own.
507 (6)(f) Failing to report to the department any person who
508 the licensee knows is in violation of this chapter or of the
509 rules of the department. However, a person who the licensee
510 knows is unable to practice naturopathic medicine with
511 reasonable skill and safety to patients by reason of illness or
512 use of alcohol, drugs, narcotics, chemicals, or any other type
513 of material, or as a result of a mental or physical condition,
514 may be reported to a consultant operating an impaired
515 practitioner program as described in s. 456.076 rather than to
516 the department.
517 (7)(g) Aiding, assisting, procuring, employing, or
518 advising any unlicensed person to practice naturopathic medicine
519 contrary to this chapter or to a rule of the department.
520 (8)(h) Failing to perform any statutory or legal
521 obligation placed upon a licensed naturopathic doctor physician.
522 (9)(i) Making or filing a report which the licensee knows
523 to be false, intentionally or negligently failing to file a
524 report or record required by state or federal law, willfully
525 impeding or obstructing such filing or inducing another person
Page 21 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
526 to do so. Such reports or records shall include only those which
527 are signed in the capacity as a licensed naturopathic doctor
528 physician.
529 (j) Paying or receiving any commission, bonus, kickback,
530 or rebate, or engaging in any split-fee arrangement in any form
531 whatsoever with a physician, organization, agency, or person,
532 either directly or indirectly, for patients referred to
533 providers of health care goods and services, including, but not
534 limited to, hospitals, nursing homes, clinical laboratories,
535 ambulatory surgical centers, or pharmacies. The provisions of
536 This paragraph shall not be construed to prevent a naturopathic
537 physician from receiving a fee for professional consultation
538 services.
539 (10)(k) Exercising influence within a patient-physician
540 relationship for purposes of engaging a patient in sexual
541 activity. A patient is shall be presumed to be incapable of
542 giving free, full, and informed consent to sexual activity with
543 her or his naturopathic doctor physician.
544 (l) Making deceptive, untrue, or fraudulent
545 representations in the practice of naturopathic medicine or
546 employing a trick or scheme in the practice of naturopathic
547 medicine when such scheme or trick fails to conform to the
548 generally prevailing standards of treatment in the medical
549 community.
550 (m) Soliciting patients, either personally or through an
Page 22 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
551 agent, through the use of fraud, intimidation, undue influence,
552 or a form of overreaching or vexatious conduct. A "solicitation"
553 is any communication which directly or implicitly requests an
554 immediate oral response from the recipient.
555 (11)(n) Failing to keep written medical records justifying
556 the course of treatment of the patient, including, but not
557 limited to, patient histories, examination results, test
558 results, X rays, and records of the prescribing, dispensing and
559 administering of drugs.
560 (12)(o) Exercising influence on the patient or client in
561 such a manner as to exploit the patient or client for the
562 financial gain of the licensee or of a third party, which shall
563 include, but not be limited to, the promoting or selling of
564 services, goods, appliances, or drugs and the promoting or
565 advertising on any prescription form of a community pharmacy
566 unless the form also states "This prescription may be filled at
567 any pharmacy of your choice."
568 (p) Performing professional services which have not been
569 duly authorized by the patient or client, or her or his legal
570 representative, except as provided in s. 743.064, s. 766.103, or
571 s. 768.13.
572 (q) Prescribing, dispensing, administering, mixing, or
573 otherwise preparing a legend drug, including any controlled
574 substance, other than in the course of the naturopathic
575 physician's professional practice. For the purposes of this
Page 23 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
576 paragraph, it shall be legally presumed that prescribing,
577 dispensing, administering, mixing, or otherwise preparing legend
578 drugs, including all controlled substances, inappropriately or
579 in excessive or inappropriate quantities is not in the best
580 interest of the patient and is not in the course of the
581 naturopathic physician's professional practice, without regard
582 to her or his intent.
583 (r) Prescribing, dispensing, or administering any
584 medicinal drug appearing on any schedule set forth in chapter
585 893 by the naturopathic physician to herself or himself, except
586 one prescribed, dispensed, or administered to the naturopathic
587 physician by another practitioner authorized to prescribe,
588 dispense, or administer medicinal drugs.
589 (13)(s) Being unable to practice naturopathic medicine
590 with reasonable skill and safety to patients by reason of
591 illness or use of alcohol, drugs, narcotics, chemicals, or any
592 other type of material or as a result of any mental or physical
593 condition. In enforcing this paragraph, the department shall
594 have, upon a finding of the State Surgeon General or the State
595 Surgeon General's designee that probable cause exists to believe
596 that the licensee is unable to serve as a naturopathic doctor
597 due to the reasons stated in this paragraph, the department
598 shall have the authority to issue an order to compel the
599 licensee, authority to compel a naturopathic physician to submit
600 to a mental or physical examination by a physician physicians
Page 24 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
601 designated by the department. If the licensee does not comply
602 with such order, the department's order directing failure of a
603 naturopathic physician to submit to such an examination may be
604 enforced by filing a petition for enforcement in the circuit
605 court for the county in which the naturopathic doctor resides or
606 does business. The naturopathic doctor against whom the petition
607 is filed may not be named or identified by initials in any
608 public court record or document, and the proceedings must be
609 closed to the public. The department is entitled to the summary
610 procedure provided in s. 51.011 when so directed shall
611 constitute an admission of the allegations against her or him
612 upon which a default and final order may be entered without the
613 taking of testimony or presentation of evidence, unless the
614 failure was due to circumstances beyond the naturopathic
615 physician's control. A naturopathic doctor subject to an order
616 issued physician affected under this paragraph must, shall at
617 reasonable intervals, be afforded an opportunity to demonstrate
618 that she or he can resume the competent practice of naturopathic
619 medicine with reasonable skill and safety to patients. In any
620 proceeding under this paragraph, neither the record of
621 proceedings nor the orders entered by the department may be used
622 against a naturopathic doctor physician in any other proceeding.
623 (14)(t) Gross or repeated malpractice or the failure to
624 practice naturopathic medicine with that level of care, skill,
625 and treatment which is recognized by a reasonably prudent
Page 25 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
626 similar physician as being acceptable under similar conditions
627 and circumstances. The department shall give great weight to the
628 provisions of s. 766.102 when enforcing this paragraph.
629 (u) Performing any procedure or prescribing any therapy
630 which, by the prevailing standards of medical practice in the
631 community, constitutes experimentation on a human subject,
632 without first obtaining full, informed, and written consent.
633 (15)(v) Practicing or offering to practice beyond the
634 scope permitted by law or accepting and performing professional
635 responsibilities which the licensee knows or has reason to know
636 that she or he is not competent to perform.
637 (16)(w) Delegating professional responsibilities to a
638 person when the licensee delegating such responsibilities knows
639 or has reason to know that such person is not qualified by
640 training, experience, or licensure to perform them.
641 (17)(x) Violating a lawful order of the board or the
642 department previously entered in a disciplinary hearing or
643 failing to comply with a lawfully issued subpoena of the board
644 or department.
645 (18)(y) Conspiring with another licensee or with any other
646 person to commit an act, or committing an act, which would tend
647 to coerce, intimidate, or preclude another licensee from
648 lawfully advertising her or his services.
649 (19) Fraud or deceit or gross negligence, incompetence, or
650 misconduct in the operation of a course of study.
Page 26 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
651 (z) Procuring, or aiding or abetting in the procuring of,
652 an unlawful termination of pregnancy.
653 (aa) Presigning blank prescription forms.
654 (bb) Prescribing by the naturopathic physician for office
655 use any medicinal drug appearing on Schedule II in chapter 893.
656 (cc) Prescribing, ordering, dispensing, administering,
657 supplying, selling, or giving any drug which is an amphetamine
658 or sympathomimetic amine drug, or a compound designated pursuant
659 to chapter 893 as a Schedule II controlled substance to or for
660 any person except for:
661 1. The treatment of narcolepsy; hyperkinesis; behavioral
662 syndrome in children characterized by the developmentally
663 inappropriate symptoms of moderate to severe distractability,
664 short attention span, hyperactivity, emotional lability, and
665 impulsivity; or drug-induced brain dysfunction.
666 2. The differential diagnostic psychiatric evaluation of
667 depression or the treatment of depression shown to be refractory
668 to other therapeutic modalities.
669 3. The clinical investigation of the effects of such drugs
670 or compounds when an investigative protocol therefor is
671 submitted to, reviewed, and approved by the department before
672 such investigation is begun.
673 (dd) Prescribing, ordering, dispensing, administering,
674 supplying, selling, or giving growth hormones, testosterone or
675 its analogs, human chorionic gonadotropin (HCG), or other
Page 27 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
676 hormones for the purpose of muscle building or to enhance
677 athletic performance. For the purposes of this subsection, the
678 term "muscle building" does not include the treatment of injured
679 muscle. A prescription written for the drug products listed
680 above may be dispensed by the pharmacist with the presumption
681 that the prescription is for legitimate medical use.
682 (20) Failing to comply with state, county, or municipal
683 regulations or reporting requirements relating to public health
684 and the control of contagious and infectious diseases.
685 (21)(ee) Violating any provision of this chapter or
686 chapter 456, or any rule rules adopted pursuant thereto.
687 (2) The department may enter an order denying licensure or
688 imposing any of the penalties in s. 456.072(2) against any
689 applicant for licensure or licensee who is found guilty of
690 violating any provision of subsection (1) of this section or who
691 is found guilty of violating any provision of s. 456.072(1).
692 (3) The department shall not reinstate the license of a
693 naturopathic physician until such time as the department is
694 satisfied that such person has complied with all the terms and
695 conditions set forth in the final order and that such person is
696 capable of safely engaging in the practice of naturopathic
697 medicine.
698 (4) The department shall by rule establish guidelines for
699 the disposition of disciplinary cases involving specific types
700 of violations. Such guidelines may include minimum and maximum
Page 28 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
701 fines, periods of supervision or probation, or conditions of
702 probation or reissuance of a license.
703 Section 14. Paragraph (g) of subsection (3) of section
704 20.43, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
705 20.43 Department of Health.—There is created a Department
706 of Health.
707 (3) The following divisions of the Department of Health
708 are established:
709 (g) Division of Medical Quality Assurance, which is
710 responsible for the following boards and professions established
711 within the division:
712 1. The Board of Acupuncture, created under chapter 457.
713 2. The Board of Medicine, created under chapter 458.
714 3. The Board of Osteopathic Medicine, created under
715 chapter 459.
716 4. The Board of Chiropractic Medicine, created under
717 chapter 460.
718 5. The Board of Podiatric Medicine, created under chapter
719 461.
720 6. Naturopathic Medicine Naturopathy, as provided under
721 chapter 462.
722 7. The Board of Optometry, created under chapter 463.
723 8. The Board of Nursing, created under part I of chapter
724 464.
725 9. Nursing assistants, as provided under part II of
Page 29 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
726 chapter 464.
727 10. The Board of Pharmacy, created under chapter 465.
728 11. The Board of Dentistry, created under chapter 466.
729 12. Midwifery, as provided under chapter 467.
730 13. The Board of Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology,
731 created under part I of chapter 468.
732 14. The Board of Nursing Home Administrators, created
733 under part II of chapter 468.
734 15. The Board of Occupational Therapy, created under part
735 III of chapter 468.
736 16. Respiratory therapy, as provided under part V of
737 chapter 468.
738 17. Dietetics and nutrition practice, as provided under
739 part X of chapter 468.
740 18. The Board of Athletic Training, created under part
741 XIII of chapter 468.
742 19. The Board of Orthotists and Prosthetists, created
743 under part XIV of chapter 468.
744 20. Electrolysis, as provided under chapter 478.
745 21. The Board of Massage Therapy, created under chapter
746 480.
747 22. The Board of Clinical Laboratory Personnel, created
748 under part I of chapter 483.
749 23. Medical physicists, as provided under part II of
750 chapter 483.
Page 30 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
751 24. The Board of Opticianry, created under part I of
752 chapter 484.
753 25. The Board of Hearing Aid Specialists, created under
754 part II of chapter 484.
755 26. The Board of Physical Therapy Practice, created under
756 chapter 486.
757 27. The Board of Psychology, created under chapter 490.
758 28. School psychologists, as provided under chapter 490.
759 29. The Board of Clinical Social Work, Marriage and Family
760 Therapy, and Mental Health Counseling, created under chapter
761 491.
762 30. Emergency medical technicians and paramedics, as
763 provided under part III of chapter 401.
764 Section 15. Subsection (2) of section 381.0031, Florida
765 Statutes, is amended to read:
766 381.0031 Epidemiological research; report of diseases of
767 public health significance to department.—
768 (2) Any practitioner licensed in this state to practice
769 medicine, osteopathic medicine, chiropractic medicine,
770 naturopathic medicine naturopathy, or veterinary medicine; any
771 licensed pharmacist authorized under a protocol with a
772 supervising physician under s. 465.1895, or a collaborative
773 pharmacy practice agreement, as defined in s. 465.1865, to
774 perform or order and evaluate laboratory and clinical tests; any
775 hospital licensed under part I of chapter 395; or any laboratory
Page 31 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
776 appropriately certified by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
777 Services under the federal Clinical Laboratory Improvement
778 Amendments and the federal rules adopted thereunder which
779 diagnoses or suspects the existence of a disease of public
780 health significance shall immediately report the fact to the
781 Department of Health.
782 Section 16. Subsection (11) of section 468.301, Florida
783 Statutes, is amended to read:
784 468.301 Definitions.—As used in this part, the term:
785 (11) "Licensed practitioner" means a person who is
786 licensed or otherwise authorized by law to practice medicine,
787 podiatric medicine, chiropody, osteopathic medicine,
788 naturopathic medicine naturopathy, or chiropractic medicine in
789 this state.
790 Section 17. Subsection (1) of section 476.044, Florida
791 Statutes, is amended to read:
792 476.044 Exemptions.—This chapter does not apply to the
793 following persons when practicing pursuant to their professional
794 responsibilities and duties:
795 (1) Persons authorized under the laws of this state to
796 practice medicine, surgery, osteopathic medicine, chiropractic
797 medicine, naturopathic medicine naturopathy, or podiatric
798 medicine;
799 Section 18. Paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of section
800 477.0135, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
Page 32 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
801 477.0135 Exemptions.—
802 (1) This chapter does not apply to the following persons
803 when practicing pursuant to their professional or occupational
804 responsibilities and duties:
805 (a) Persons authorized under the laws of this state to
806 practice medicine, surgery, osteopathic medicine, chiropractic
807 medicine, massage therapy, naturopathic medicine naturopathy, or
808 podiatric medicine.
809 Section 19. Subsections (2) and (3) of section 485.003,
810 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
811 485.003 Definitions.—In construing this chapter, the
812 words, phrases, or terms, unless the context otherwise
813 indicates, shall have the following meanings:
814 (2) "Healing arts" shall mean the practice of medicine,
815 surgery, psychiatry, dentistry, osteopathic medicine,
816 chiropractic medicine, naturopathic medicine naturopathy,
817 podiatric medicine, chiropody, psychology, clinical social work,
818 marriage and family therapy, mental health counseling, and
819 optometry.
820 (3) "Practitioner of the healing arts" shall mean a person
821 licensed under the laws of the state to practice medicine,
822 surgery, psychiatry, dentistry, osteopathic medicine,
823 chiropractic medicine, naturopathic medicine naturopathy,
824 podiatric medicine, chiropody, psychology, clinical social work,
825 marriage and family therapy, mental health counseling, or
Page 33 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
826 optometry within the scope of his or her professional training
827 and competence and within the purview of the statutes applicable
828 to his or her respective profession, and who may refer a patient
829 for treatment by a qualified person, who shall employ hypnotic
830 techniques under the supervision, direction, prescription, and
831 responsibility of such referring practitioner.
832 Section 20. Subsection (1) of section 486.161, Florida
833 Statutes, is amended to read:
834 486.161 Exemptions.—
835 (1) No provision of This chapter does not shall be
836 construed to prohibit any person licensed in this state from
837 using any physical agent as a part of, or incidental to, the
838 lawful practice of her or his profession under the statutes
839 applicable to the profession of chiropractic physician,
840 podiatric physician, doctor of medicine, massage therapist,
841 nurse, osteopathic physician or surgeon, occupational therapist,
842 or naturopathic doctor naturopath.
843 Section 21. Paragraph (h) of subsection (4) of section
844 627.351, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
845 627.351 Insurance risk apportionment plans.—
846 (4) MEDICAL MALPRACTICE RISK APPORTIONMENT; ASSOCIATION
847 CONTRACTS AND PURCHASES.—
848 (h) As used in this subsection:
849 1. "Health care provider" means hospitals licensed under
850 chapter 395; physicians licensed under chapter 458; osteopathic
Page 34 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
851 physicians licensed under chapter 459; podiatric physicians
852 licensed under chapter 461; dentists licensed under chapter 466;
853 chiropractic physicians licensed under chapter 460; naturopathic
854 doctors naturopaths licensed under chapter 462; nurses licensed
855 under part I of chapter 464; midwives licensed under chapter
856 467; physician assistants licensed under chapter 458 or chapter
857 459; physical therapists and physical therapist assistants
858 licensed under chapter 486; health maintenance organizations
859 certificated under part I of chapter 641; ambulatory surgical
860 centers licensed under chapter 395; other medical facilities as
861 defined in subparagraph 2.; blood banks, plasma centers,
862 industrial clinics, and renal dialysis facilities; or
863 professional associations, partnerships, corporations, joint
864 ventures, or other associations for professional activity by
865 health care providers.
866 2. "Other medical facility" means a facility the primary
867 purpose of which is to provide human medical diagnostic services
868 or a facility providing nonsurgical human medical treatment, to
869 which facility the patient is admitted and from which facility
870 the patient is discharged within the same working day, and which
871 facility is not part of a hospital. However, a facility existing
872 for the primary purpose of performing terminations of pregnancy
873 or an office maintained by a physician or dentist for the
874 practice of medicine may not be construed to be an "other
875 medical facility."
Page 35 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
876 3. "Health care facility" means any hospital licensed
877 under chapter 395, health maintenance organization certificated
878 under part I of chapter 641, ambulatory surgical center licensed
879 under chapter 395, or other medical facility as defined in
880 subparagraph 2.
881 Section 22. Subsection (23) of section 893.02, Florida
882 Statutes, is amended to read:
883 893.02 Definitions.—The following words and phrases as
884 used in this chapter shall have the following meanings, unless
885 the context otherwise requires:
886 (23) "Practitioner" means a physician licensed under
887 chapter 458, a dentist licensed under chapter 466, a
888 veterinarian licensed under chapter 474, an osteopathic
889 physician licensed under chapter 459, an advanced practice
890 registered nurse licensed under chapter 464, a naturopathic
891 doctor naturopath licensed under chapter 462, a certified
892 optometrist licensed under chapter 463, a psychiatric nurse as
893 defined in s. 394.455, a podiatric physician licensed under
894 chapter 461, or a physician assistant licensed under chapter 458
895 or chapter 459, provided such practitioner holds a valid federal
896 controlled substance registry number.
897 Section 23. Paragraph (g) of subsection (3) of section
898 921.0022, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
899 921.0022 Criminal Punishment Code; offense severity
900 ranking chart.—
Page 36 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
901 (3) OFFENSE SEVERITY RANKING CHART
902 (g) LEVEL 7
903
Florida Felony
Statute Degree Description
904
316.027(2)(c) 1st Accident involving death,
failure to stop; leaving scene.
905
316.193(3)(c)2. 3rd DUI resulting in serious bodily
injury.
906
316.1935(3)(b) 1st Causing serious bodily injury
or death to another person;
driving at high speed or with
wanton disregard for safety
while fleeing or attempting to
elude law enforcement officer
who is in a patrol vehicle with
siren and lights activated.
907
327.35(3)(a)3.b. 3rd Vessel BUI resulting in serious
bodily injury.
908
402.319(2) 2nd Misrepresentation and
Page 37 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
negligence or intentional act
resulting in great bodily harm,
permanent disfiguration,
permanent disability, or death.
909
409.920 3rd Medicaid provider fraud;
(2)(b)1.a. $10,000 or less.
910
409.920 2nd Medicaid provider fraud; more
(2)(b)1.b. than $10,000, but less than
$50,000.
911
456.065(2) 3rd Practicing a health care
profession without a license.
912
456.065(2) 2nd Practicing a health care
profession without a license
which results in serious bodily
injury.
913
458.327(1) 3rd Practicing medicine without a
license.
914
459.013(1) 3rd Practicing osteopathic medicine
without a license.
Page 38 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
915
460.411(1) 3rd Practicing chiropractic
medicine without a license.
916
461.012(1) 3rd Practicing podiatric medicine
without a license.
917
462.019 462.17 3rd Practicing naturopathic
medicine naturopathy without a
license.
918
463.015(1) 3rd Practicing optometry without a
license.
919
464.016(1) 3rd Practicing nursing without a
license.
920
465.015(2) 3rd Practicing pharmacy without a
license.
921
466.026(1) 3rd Practicing dentistry or dental
hygiene without a license.
922
467.201 3rd Practicing midwifery without a
license.
Page 39 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
923
468.366 3rd Delivering respiratory care
services without a license.
924
483.828(1) 3rd Practicing as clinical
laboratory personnel without a
license.
925
483.901(7) 3rd Practicing medical physics
without a license.
926
484.013(1)(c) 3rd Preparing or dispensing optical
devices without a prescription.
927
484.053 3rd Dispensing hearing aids without
a license.
928
494.0018(2) 1st Conviction of any violation of
chapter 494 in which the total
money and property unlawfully
obtained exceeded $50,000 and
there were five or more
victims.
929
560.123(8)(b)1. 3rd Failure to report currency or
Page 40 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
payment instruments exceeding
$300 but less than $20,000 by a
money services business.
930
560.125(5)(a) 3rd Money services business by
unauthorized person, currency
or payment instruments
exceeding $300 but less than
$20,000.
931
655.50(10)(b)1. 3rd Failure to report financial
transactions exceeding $300 but
less than $20,000 by financial
institution.
932
775.21(10)(a) 3rd Sexual predator; failure to
register; failure to renew
driver license or
identification card; other
registration violations.
933
775.21(10)(b) 3rd Sexual predator working where
children regularly congregate.
934
775.21(10)(g) 3rd Failure to report or providing
Page 41 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
false information about a
sexual predator; harbor or
conceal a sexual predator.
935
782.051(3) 2nd Attempted felony murder of a
person by a person other than
the perpetrator or the
perpetrator of an attempted
felony.
936
782.07(1) 2nd Killing of a human being by the
act, procurement, or culpable
negligence of another
(manslaughter).
937
782.071 2nd Killing of a human being or
unborn child by the operation
of a motor vehicle in a
reckless manner (vehicular
homicide).
938
782.072 2nd Killing of a human being by the
operation of a vessel in a
reckless manner (vessel
homicide).
Page 42 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
939
784.045(1)(a)1. 2nd Aggravated battery;
intentionally causing great
bodily harm or disfigurement.
940
784.045(1)(a)2. 2nd Aggravated battery; using
deadly weapon.
941
784.045(1)(b) 2nd Aggravated battery; perpetrator
aware victim pregnant.
942
784.048(4) 3rd Aggravated stalking; violation
of injunction or court order.
943
784.048(7) 3rd Aggravated stalking; violation
of court order.
944
784.07(2)(d) 1st Aggravated battery on law
enforcement officer.
945
784.074(1)(a) 1st Aggravated battery on sexually
violent predators facility
staff.
946
784.08(2)(a) 1st Aggravated battery on a person
Page 43 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
65 years of age or older.
947
784.081(1) 1st Aggravated battery on specified
official or employee.
948
784.082(1) 1st Aggravated battery by detained
person on visitor or other
detainee.
949
784.083(1) 1st Aggravated battery on code
inspector.
950
787.025(2)(b) 2nd Luring or enticing a child;
second or subsequent offense.
951
787.025(2)(c) 2nd Luring or enticing a child with
a specified prior conviction.
952
787.06(3)(a)2. 1st Human trafficking using
coercion for labor and services
of an adult.
953
787.06(3)(e)2. 1st Human trafficking using
coercion for labor and services
by the transfer or transport of
Page 44 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
an adult from outside Florida
to within the state.
954
790.07(4) 1st Specified weapons violation
subsequent to previous
conviction of s. 790.07(1) or
(2).
955
790.16(1) 1st Discharge of a machine gun
under specified circumstances.
956
790.165(2) 2nd Manufacture, sell, possess, or
deliver hoax bomb.
957
790.165(3) 2nd Possessing, displaying, or
threatening to use any hoax
bomb while committing or
attempting to commit a felony.
958
790.166(3) 2nd Possessing, selling, using, or
attempting to use a hoax weapon
of mass destruction.
959
790.166(4) 2nd Possessing, displaying, or
threatening to use a hoax
Page 45 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
weapon of mass destruction
while committing or attempting
to commit a felony.
960
790.23 1st,PBL Possession of a firearm by a
person who qualifies for the
penalty enhancements provided
for in s. 874.04.
961
794.08(4) 3rd Female genital mutilation;
consent by a parent, guardian,
or a person in custodial
authority to a victim younger
than 18 years of age.
962
796.05(1) 1st Live on earnings of a
prostitute; 2nd offense.
963
796.05(1) 1st Live on earnings of a
prostitute; 3rd and subsequent
offense.
964
800.04(5)(c)1. 2nd Lewd or lascivious molestation;
victim younger than 12 years of
age; offender younger than 18
Page 46 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
years of age.
965
800.04(5)(c)2. 2nd Lewd or lascivious molestation;
victim 12 years of age or older
but younger than 16 years of
age; offender 18 years of age
or older.
966
800.04(5)(e) 1st Lewd or lascivious molestation;
victim 12 years of age or older
but younger than 16 years;
offender 18 years or older;
prior conviction for specified
sex offense.
967
806.01(2) 2nd Maliciously damage structure by
fire or explosive.
968
810.02(3)(a) 2nd Burglary of occupied dwelling;
unarmed; no assault or battery.
969
810.02(3)(b) 2nd Burglary of unoccupied
dwelling; unarmed; no assault
or battery.
970
Page 47 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
810.02(3)(d) 2nd Burglary of occupied
conveyance; unarmed; no assault
or battery.
971
810.02(3)(e) 2nd Burglary of authorized
emergency vehicle.
972
812.014(2)(a)1. 1st Property stolen, valued at
$100,000 or more or a
semitrailer deployed by a law
enforcement officer; property
stolen while causing other
property damage; 1st degree
grand theft.
973
812.014(2)(b)2. 2nd Property stolen, cargo valued
at less than $50,000, grand
theft in 2nd degree.
974
812.014(2)(b)3. 2nd Property stolen, emergency
medical equipment; 2nd degree
grand theft.
975
812.014(2)(b)4. 2nd Property stolen, law
enforcement equipment from
Page 48 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
authorized emergency vehicle.
976
812.014(2)(g) 2nd Grand theft; second degree;
firearm with previous
conviction of s.
812.014(2)(c)5.
977
812.0145(2)(a) 1st Theft from person 65 years of
age or older; $50,000 or more.
978
812.019(2) 1st Stolen property; initiates,
organizes, plans, etc., the
theft of property and traffics
in stolen property.
979
812.131(2)(a) 2nd Robbery by sudden snatching.
980
812.133(2)(b) 1st Carjacking; no firearm, deadly
weapon, or other weapon.
981
817.034(4)(a)1. 1st Communications fraud, value
greater than $50,000.
982
817.234(8)(a) 2nd Solicitation of motor vehicle
accident victims with intent to
Page 49 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
defraud.
983
817.234(9) 2nd Organizing, planning, or
participating in an intentional
motor vehicle collision.
984
817.234(11)(c) 1st Insurance fraud; property value
$100,000 or more.
985
817.2341 1st Making false entries of
(2)(b) & material fact or false
(3)(b) statements regarding property
values relating to the solvency
of an insuring entity which are
a significant cause of the
insolvency of that entity.
986
817.418(2)(a) 3rd Offering for sale or
advertising personal protective
equipment with intent to
defraud.
987
817.504(1)(a) 3rd Offering or advertising a
vaccine with intent to defraud.
988
Page 50 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
817.535(2)(a) 3rd Filing false lien or other
unauthorized document.
989
817.611(2)(b) 2nd Traffic in or possess 15 to 49
counterfeit credit cards or
related documents.
990
825.102(3)(b) 2nd Neglecting an elderly person or
disabled adult causing great
bodily harm, disability, or
disfigurement.
991
825.103(3)(b) 2nd Exploiting an elderly person or
disabled adult and property is
valued at $10,000 or more, but
less than $50,000.
992
827.03(2)(b) 2nd Neglect of a child causing
great bodily harm, disability,
or disfigurement.
993
827.04(3) 3rd Impregnation of a child under
16 years of age by person 21
years of age or older.
994
Page 51 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
827.071(2) & (3) 2nd Use or induce a child in a
sexual performance, or promote
or direct such performance.
995
827.071(4) 2nd Possess with intent to promote
any photographic material,
motion picture, etc., which
includes child pornography.
996
837.05(2) 3rd Giving false information about
alleged capital felony to a law
enforcement officer.
997
838.015 2nd Bribery.
998
838.016 2nd Unlawful compensation or reward
for official behavior.
999
838.021(3)(a) 2nd Unlawful harm to a public
servant.
1000
838.22 2nd Bid tampering.
1001
843.0855(2) 3rd Impersonation of a public
officer or employee.
Page 52 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
1002
843.0855(3) 3rd Unlawful simulation of legal
process.
1003
843.0855(4) 3rd Intimidation of a public
officer or employee.
1004
847.0135(3) 3rd Solicitation of a child, via a
computer service, to commit an
unlawful sex act.
1005
847.0135(4) 2nd Traveling to meet a minor to
commit an unlawful sex act.
1006
872.06 2nd Abuse of a dead human body.
1007
874.05(2)(b) 1st Encouraging or recruiting
person under 13 to join a
criminal gang; second or
subsequent offense.
1008
874.10 1st,PBL Knowingly initiates, organizes,
plans, finances, directs,
manages, or supervises criminal
gang-related activity.
Page 53 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
1009
893.13(1)(c)1. 1st Sell, manufacture, or deliver
cocaine (or other drug
prohibited under s.
893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d),
(2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5.)
within 1,000 feet of a child
care facility, school, or
state, county, or municipal
park or publicly owned
recreational facility or
community center.
1010
893.13(1)(e)1. 1st Sell, manufacture, or deliver
cocaine or other drug
prohibited under s.
893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d),
(2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5.,
within 1,000 feet of property
used for religious services or
a specified business site.
1011
893.13(4)(a) 1st Use or hire of minor; deliver
to minor other controlled
substance.
Page 54 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
1012
893.135(1)(a)1. 1st Trafficking in cannabis, more
than 25 lbs., less than 2,000
lbs.
1013
893.135 1st Trafficking in cocaine, more
(1)(b)1.a. than 28 grams, less than 200
grams.
1014
893.135 1st Trafficking in illegal drugs,
(1)(c)1.a. more than 4 grams, less than 14
grams.
1015
893.135 1st Trafficking in hydrocodone, 28
(1)(c)2.a. grams or more, less than 50
grams.
1016
893.135 1st Trafficking in hydrocodone, 50
(1)(c)2.b. grams or more, less than 100
grams.
1017
893.135 1st Trafficking in oxycodone, 7
(1)(c)3.a. grams or more, less than 14
grams.
1018
Page 55 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
893.135 1st Trafficking in oxycodone, 14
(1)(c)3.b. grams or more, less than 25
grams.
1019
893.135 1st Trafficking in fentanyl, 4
(1)(c)4.b.(I) grams or more, less than 14
grams.
1020
893.135 1st Trafficking in phencyclidine,
(1)(d)1.a. 28 grams or more, less than 200
grams.
1021
893.135(1)(e)1. 1st Trafficking in methaqualone,
200 grams or more, less than 5
kilograms.
1022
893.135(1)(f)1. 1st Trafficking in amphetamine, 14
grams or more, less than 28
grams.
1023
893.135 1st Trafficking in flunitrazepam, 4
(1)(g)1.a. grams or more, less than 14
grams.
1024
893.135 1st Trafficking in gamma-
Page 56 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
(1)(h)1.a. hydroxybutyric acid (GHB), 1
kilogram or more, less than 5
kilograms.
1025
893.135 1st Trafficking in 1,4-Butanediol,
(1)(j)1.a. 1 kilogram or more, less than 5
kilograms.
1026
893.135 1st Trafficking in Phenethylamines,
(1)(k)2.a. 10 grams or more, less than 200
grams.
1027
893.135 1st Trafficking in synthetic
(1)(m)2.a. cannabinoids, 280 grams or
more, less than 500 grams.
1028
893.135 1st Trafficking in synthetic
(1)(m)2.b. cannabinoids, 500 grams or
more, less than 1,000 grams.
1029
893.135 1st Trafficking in n-benzyl
(1)(n)2.a. phenethylamines, 14 grams or
more, less than 100 grams.
1030
893.1351(2) 2nd Possession of place for
Page 57 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
trafficking in or manufacturing
of controlled substance.
1031
896.101(5)(a) 3rd Money laundering, financial
transactions exceeding $300 but
less than $20,000.
1032
896.104(4)(a)1. 3rd Structuring transactions to
evade reporting or registration
requirements, financial
transactions exceeding $300 but
less than $20,000.
1033
943.0435(4)(c) 2nd Sexual offender vacating
permanent residence; failure to
comply with reporting
requirements.
1034
943.0435(8) 2nd Sexual offender; remains in
state after indicating intent
to leave; failure to comply
with reporting requirements.
1035
943.0435(9)(a) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to
comply with reporting
Page 58 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
requirements.
1036
943.0435(13) 3rd Failure to report or providing
false information about a
sexual offender; harbor or
conceal a sexual offender.
1037
943.0435(14) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to
report and reregister; failure
to respond to address
verification; providing false
registration information.
1038
944.607(9) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to
comply with reporting
requirements.
1039
944.607(10)(a) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to
submit to the taking of a
digitized photograph.
1040
944.607(12) 3rd Failure to report or providing
false information about a
sexual offender; harbor or
conceal a sexual offender.
Page 59 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 223 2026
1041
944.607(13) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to
report and reregister; failure
to respond to address
verification; providing false
registration information.
1042
985.4815(10) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to
submit to the taking of a
digitized photograph.
1043
985.4815(12) 3rd Failure to report or providing
false information about a
sexual offender; harbor or
conceal a sexual offender.
1044
985.4815(13) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to
report and reregister; failure
to respond to address
verification; providing false
registration information.
1045
1046 Section 24. This act shall take effect December 31, 2026.
Page 60 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb223-00